New York, session 2025-2026, A2187.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any law, rule or regulation to the contra- 2 ry, within cities having a population of one million or more, any 3 affordable housing program initiated after the effective date of this 4 act shall use the lower of the area median income proportional to the 5 zip code in which the program is located or the regional area median 6 income in which the program is located. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01963-01-5